updates/files/_internal/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_is.dic
2skur.
3skurð
sk5urnar
4skurt
4skú.
3skúf
4skúg
4skúl
2skv4
sk4vö
1sky
5skyg
3skyld
skyr3k
3ský
1skæ
4skög
5sköm
4skön
3sköp
3skör
2sl
sl3að
3slagu
slag5æ
s4lak
s5lampi
s3land
sland4s5
s1lau
3slá.
4slág
s1lán
1slát
3slátt
s5lega
s2leggj
s2legi
3slegin
s2leif.
3sleikja
s4lek
5s2lep
s2let
3slett
3slé
s2lin
s1list
3slit.
3sliti
slí4
3slíp
s3ljóð
4slog
5sloppu
s4lot
5slóði
slu3st
4slyg
s3lyk
3s2lyng
3s4læð
3slægj
s1læk
5slæmu
3slök
s3lönd
s4löng
sm2
2s1ma4
3smali
sm5ans
smá3g
3smár
smá3s
2sme
s2mek
s4mel
5smeyg
5smiðjan
3s4miðu
s5minni
s5mis
3smí
5smíð
4smíl
3smokk
s5morð
2smó
s1mu
3smuga
s3mun
s3mú
5smyrs
4smý
2smæ
s2mölu
s2n2
4sna.
2snaf
sn4ak
4snal
5snara.
sn4au
5snauðu
4snám
5snáp
2snef
s3nefn
3s4nei
5snek
2s3nes
s5net
5sneyd
4sni.
3snið.
5snig
1snil
sn3is
sn4isk
sni4v
snj4
5snja
snjó1
5snjór
snjó3s
sn3un
5snúa
5snún
5snæld
s5oddu
s4ok
1sokk
5solt
3son
s4op
s5op.
4s1orð
s4or4p3
1só2
3sók
sól1
sól5ar5
2sólf
sól5k
sól3m
2só4s
só4t
3sótt.
1sp4
spa2
5spak
4spal
4spap
spari3
2spart
spá5fa
4speð
5spek
4spey
2spíp
3spj
2spl
s3pla
5spor.
5spón
2sprent
2spres
3spret
2spró
spun4
4spú
4spyt
5spöl
2s1r
sr4an
s5rá
s5re
sr4i
4s1s
s2sa
ss3ann
ss1er
s3sinni
ss3ir
ss3ís
ssk4
s3skó
ssl4
s2sn4
s4s3or
sst4i
s4stir
ss5ugu
ssum4
ss1un
s2t
4st.
st2a
2sta.
3s4tað
s4taf
staf4ar
3stafur
3stakk
2stala
st3ali.
4stan.
5stand.
st3ann
5stapp
4star.
3starf
star2fa
st3arn
5staur.
4stav
4stax
4stá.
3stál
stál3s
1ste
4ste.
5sted
3stef
4steig
3stein
2stek
3stekk
4sten
4step
3sterk
4stet
4stex
5steyp
3sté
4stf
2sti.
3stig
3stika
4stilf
4stilh
4stilk
3stimp
4stind
3stirð
5stirt
st2is
sti5sk
4stit
3stíg
4stík
4stím
4stír
4stís
3stj4
4stjón
st1l
stn4ó
3sto
4stol
5stola
5stoli
2stoll
stor4
4storg
4stób
4stóf
3stóll
4s3tón
5stór.
2stra.
3str2and
3straum
5strák
3stren
5streym
2s3tré
st2ri
3strik3
3strí
4strík
3stro
4strog
2stru
4strú
4stry
s4træ
3stræt
3strön
4sts
st5t
2stu
5stubb
3stuð
st3ugu
5stuld
3stund
5stungi
4stur
3stutt
st2ú
2s3tún
st3v4
3sty
5styt
3stý
1stæ
3stæð
3stærð
3stö
5stöð
4s3töl
4stönn
4stös
2su
3s4uða
suð4ug
5suður
suf4
3suga.
suka4
sul4i
3sullu
sum3
sum4að
3sumar
sumar3g
4sumb
s5una.
sunar5
sund4ra
sundur3
s2unna
s5unni
s5unu
4s1up
s5ura
4sus
sut4
s5úa
3súg
4súk
3súla
3súp
s5úrla
4súrr
s1úrsk
4sút
s3úts
sv4
4svag
4svak
2s5vald
s2vali
s4var.
3s4var2t
4s3vat
svav5
s5veðu
s4vef
4sveg
s2vei
3sveif
5sveigu
s3veik
3svein
3sveip
4sveis
3sveit.
5s2velg
3svep
2sver
s1verk
5sverta
s3vet
2své
svi4
4svid
5s2við.
s2viði
3svif
s4vig
s2vik
3svik.
5sviki
3svip
s5víg
2s1vík
s2vín
s3vís
s5von.
s3vot
5svu
1s2væ
3svæð
5svæf
1sy
syð4
2s1yf
2syr
s1yrð
3sý
4sý.
4sýf
2s1þ
1sæ
sæði4
4sæf
sæ5far
sæ5gr
5sæk
5sæl
sæn4
4sæx
1sö
söð3u
s1öfl
3s4ög
4s3öld
sölva5
4sönd
s5önd.
2sör
4sös
2söx
4ta.
tad4
t3afgr
taf3lið
ta3fo
taf4sl
ta5gal
tag4l
1tak.
1taka.
tak3an
5takm
4tako
3tal.
3talað
5talara
t3all.
t4a1m
ta2min
t1an
t3anb
t3anf
t2ang
tang4l
tann3s
t3anu
t3anv
2tar
t3ara
t4arag
t3ard
tarð4s
t5arðu
t3ar1g
t3arh
t3ari
tar5is
t3ar3k
t3arl
t3ar3m
tar3p
t3ars
tar3ti
t3artí
t3arv
t3arþ
tas4
t5as.
ta5sle
t3ast.
ta3ste
ta3str
t5astur
ta1t2
t5auð
1taug
5taug.
3taumu
1tax
tág4ari
3tákn
t5ákv
tál5dr
táls4
t5ás.
4t1b
t1d2
4ted
3tegu
1tek
tek5a
3tekj
4tekk
3tekn
t5en.
3tengs
5tenn
teph5
4tepí
4tepl
2ter
t3er.
4tes
2tey
t5ey.
5teygi
3teygn
t3eyj
t3eyr
4t1f4
tfir2
tfl4
tfor4
t3g2
tga4
4t1h
t2her
t2hí
t1i
t5ian
3tign.
5tigna
ti5lan
3tilef
3tilfi
til4ið
ti5lis
t3ill.
5tillag
3tillö
til3t
timbur3
t2indar
3tindur
ti5nef
tings3
t5inn.
t4ino
t4inó
ti4rá
t4irj
ti5ró
4tis
t5is.
tis5an
t4isí
tis4lö
ti4sm
t4isne
tis3s
t3ist.
t4istr
t4istu
tit4a
3tit3i
3titt
1t2í
3tíð
tí5fal
4tíl
3tím
tím5i
2tín
3tíni
5tínsl
4tís.
4tísa
tj3að
1tjald
tjar4
tjurt4
3tjöld
3tjörn.
4t1k
t2ki
4tl
tl3að
t3lag
t5lang
tl3ant
t1lau
t1lá
tl2e
t1l2i
t4lif
tli4m
t1lí
t3lo
t1ly
t1læ
t3lö
2t3m4
t2na
tn4are
tnn4
t3no
tn4s3
t1næ
4to.
tof4f
3tog
3toll
4ton
t4op
t1orð
3tor4f
5t4org
tor5i
3tot
3tóba
t5ófe
3tóft
tó4fu
tó4m
tóm3s
5tómu
tó4n
tór3au
tór5á
tór3e
tórs4
t1óttu
t1p
2tra
tr3að.
tr3aði.
tr3ar3
3traus
t1ráð
trá4k
t3reið
t5renn
5treyj
5treys
1tré
5tré.
2trét
t5rétt
2tri
tr4ind
3troð
3trog
t3róf
tr5ótt
tr3uð
5trufl5
tr1un
1trú
3trú.
3trúar
trú3f
trú3m
trú3r
1try
3tryg
5trýni
t1ræn
5trönu
5tröp
2ts
t1sa
t4saf
t4san
t2sek
ts5ekk
t1sí
t3síl
t1sk
ts1la
t3slá
ts4mæ
tsmæl4
tsn4
t4sná
ts3ne
t4spo
t4spu
ts3s4
t1st2
t4steg
t4stök
ts1ver
t2sy
2tt
tt1að
tt3á
tt3er
t2ti
tt3j
tt1la
tt1o
t2tó
ttri4
tt3ræ
tt1t
t4tu
tt3uð
tt3ugu
tt3un
tt1v4
tt3y
t1tæ
t1tö
t1u
4tu.
t2uð
t3uð.
t4uðr
t3uðu.
t3uðum
tuf4
t4ugg
t4ugi
tu4gæ
tuk4
tuka4l
t3uli.
tu3lið
t3ull
t4ulu
4tu1m
tun5ar
t2ung
t4ungl
3tungu.
3tunna.
t5unni
t2up
t5upp
2tur.
t3ure
5turn.
t2urni
5turnin
turr4
tu1s
t3us.
5tuska.
tu3s4l
t3ust.
tu3ta
t3úð
2tú3g
tú4n
3t4úni
t1úr
t2úr.
túra4
t1va
tvarps3
t1ve
t1vi
tví1
tví3f
tvím4
tvít4
t1vo
t1væ
t3vör
ty4
3tyl
5typ
tyr4
t3yrði.
tyr5ká
tý4r
5týr.
týr5is
t1þ
t2æ
4tæð
tæð5is
4tæf
tæk1is
3tækn
tækn2i5s
tær2s
4töð
töðv3
2töf
5töf.
t4öfl.
1töku
1töl
4töll
4töls
3tönn
4u5a4
2u1á
4u1b
ubiskup5
4u1d2
uð4af
uð4al
uð4are
uð4aro
uði4
uðl2
uðl3u
uð3m4
4uðn
uð3rú
uð4skr
uðs4v
uð3ug
uð3ul
uð3us
3uðust.
uð1v
4u1e
4u1f
uf2i
u2fl
u3flo
uf4r
u2fu
u3full
u4fur4
2ug
ug5all.
uga3sl
ug4astr
4ugá
ug3d2
4uge
u4geg
ug4gö
4ugil
u5gili
4u1gj
5ugleiki.
4ugler
4uglu
4ugó
u1gr
4ugrip
ug3sly
ug3sn
ugs2v
ug3v
4ugæ
4ugö
4u1h
4u1i
2u1í
2u1j2
ujárns5
4uk
u1ke
u1kj
ukk5un
u1ko
u1kr
u3kú
u1kv
u5ky
u5kæ
2ul
u1la
u2laf
ula4g
ulags5
4ul4au
u3lág
u3lán
4ule
5uleyg
u5lé
u3lind
u3lis
u3lit
u1lí
4u1lj
u4ljá
ull5an
ul4lá
ull3d
ull1s4
ull3t2
4u1lo
u3ló
ul2sá
ul1sk
uls4v
ult4i
u3lund
ulv4
u1ly
4u1lý
u1læ
ulækj4
u1lö
3um.
4uma
umal4i
uma4r
umar5af
um3ari
2u1má4
umb2
4umba
umb5ar
3umboð
1umd
umd4a
4ume
5umferð
4umi
u1mið
u2mið.
umin4
u5mis
2umj
2uml
3umleit
um4mað
um3me
4umn
2umo
2umó
u4mós
2ump
um4ru
um1s
um4sí
um1t2
2umu
u3munu
4umú
4umy
2umý
2umæ
2umö
4unaf
4unag
unar3s
una3s
4u1nau
4uná
2und
und3i
undir1
und4ó
undr3un
4une
4ungá
un3ge
4ungn
ung4s
ung5æð
4uni.
un5il
4unir
4unis
4uní
4unj4
4unk
unkamb4
un4ke
un4li
2unna.
unns4l
unn5t
2unnu
4u3no
2unó
un4ót
u3nótt.
un4sár
un4si
uns4v
2unt
un4tr
4unur
4unú
2u3ný
4unæ
4unö
2u1o
2u1ó
2upa
upar4
4upat
up5ár
4upe
4u5pí
4upl
4u1po
4upó
1upp1
upp3a4l
uppi3
upp3s
4u1pr
up4sm
4upu
4upú
upúl4
4upö
1ur
3ur.
2ura
ur3amt
4u1rann
urap4
u5rass
2urá
u1ráð
3ur3ál
4urán
urd4
urð4ará
2ure
4ureg
u3regl
4u1rei
4urek
ur3end
ur1ey
4u1ré
ur1g
urg4i
urg4l
ur3gr
4urid
4urið
ur4ið.
4urif
4urig
ur3in
ur4ing
4ur4is
4urit
2urí
4urík
urj2
ur1k
2url.
3urleg
url2i
ur4lý
ur3m2
urm4a
2urn.
ur5n4ó
4uroð
2u5rok
4uros
2uró
u5róf
ur5ól
ur4ór
4urr.
ur3rið
urrk4i
ur4sjá
urs3lag
ur4sök
2urta.
urt4ö
ur1u
4urub
4urud
4urut
2urú
4urúm
ur3úr
4uryk
2urý
2uræ
u5ræðu
4u3ræk
u5ræs
2urö
u5röð
2us
us5ann
u3sár.
3usd
4use
u5sei
4usí
4usj
4u1sk
us4lá
us4my
usn3a
4usó
4usp
us2r
3usso
us4t
u4st3an
4ustá
4uste
ust2in
u5sting
4ustó
3ustu.
u3stú
4ustö
u3sund
us3ung
4usú
u1sv
4usý
4ut
ut3að
utaf4a
utans4
u3tá
u1te
u1to
u3tó
utra4
ut4ská
ut4sp
ut5tak
ut3u4l
u1tæ
u3tö
4u1u
u3un
uunn3
2u1ú
4u1v4
4u5y
4u1þ
4u3æ
2u1ö
ú1a
ú2af4
ú2al
úar4a
ú2ará
úarr4
ú2as
ú3ast.
ú2at
úbb3u
ú5be
ú3br
úd1
4úða.
úð5gum
úð3k
úðm4
úð3ug
úð4ugl
úð5v
ú1e
3úel
úf3að
ú1fj
ú4fl2
úf5li
úfs4á
ú4ge
úgs2
ú3h
ú1i
úí4
ú5j
úkks4
úk3l
úk5sl
úk4sp
1úl4f
úlf5al
úlf5ar
úlf3l
úl5ín
4úll
ú3lo
úl4sp
úl4t
2ú2m
úm4be
úm1e
úm5ið
úmmí5
ún1
ún4al
ún4art
ún2as
ú4ná
ún2d
ún4e
ún3i
únis4
únj4
ún2s
ún4ug
ú3o
4úp
úp5á
úp5l
úp3r
úp5un
úr5ali
úr4ba
úrsk4
úr3s4l
úru5m
úr5un
2ú2s
ú4sa
5úsalem
úsa3m4
ús3ann
úsa3t
ús1ei
ú4s1i
ús3í
ú4skin
ú4sku
ús3mu
ús3n
ús4sv
ú4sti
ú4str
ús3u
ús1v
út1
5útfl
1útg
út2i
úti3g
út3in
útj4
útr4
út4sky
úts4v
úttó5
út3un
ú1u
ú1v
v2a2
2va.
4vad
v4af
v4ag
vagn5sk
v4ak
vak4t
v4al
1vald
4vale
val3ið
vals4l
4v4am
vamb3
vamms3t
5vanda
vand5r
van3ef
van5gá
var4á
var2m
vart5á
vart3il
v4as
vat4n
3vatn.
3v4ax
vá1
vá4k
v4e
ve3fe
vefn5d
1veg
veiði1
veið2is
5veisl
vemb5i
4venn
2vep
verk3l
verk5r
versn5a
4verta
vest3a
vestan5
vest3ur3
1vé2
vé3f
3vél
2vg
2v5h
4vi.
v4ið
við5ar
við3k
við3l
viðr3is
4viðum
2vif
vi4ke
vi4kl
vik5unn
vi1l4i
vilj1u
vilm4
vim4i
v5ing.
2vip
vir2
virf3
3virk
vis4sk
vis4v
vit3u
v2í
4ví.
4v4ía
víf4ar
ví4fi
ví4ga
ví4gó
vík4a
ví4kj
víkur3
ví5le
víó4
v4ís
3vís.
5ví4si
ví4str
4víu
4vív
4vn
voð4are
vo3fe
vog2s
vor3k
vor5n
vo3v
vr1
2vs
2vu
v5uð
v1um
v1un.
v1una
vu3s
væð3i
5væng
v4ö
vöðva3
1völl
völ4s
vönd3
w2a
wat4
w4í
xa5f
xak4
x3an
x1á
x3b
x5d
x3e
x3h
x5i2
xil5e
x5k
xl3að
x5ó
x5p
xt5á
x5tug
x3u4
x3v
y5á
y3br
yd4
4yð
yð2g
yð4isa
yðri3
yð2s
yf1
yf4á
yf2e
1yfir1
y4fis
4yfj
yfj5að
yf3læ
yf2o
yf2r
yf4y
yg2a
yg5ari
yg4g
ygl3i
ygn4is
y3h
y1i
yjaf4
yj3ar
2yk
yk1i
yk3il
ykj3ar5
ykk1is
ykk3l
ykkv4
yk4le
yk4um
ykur5
yl4g
ylk3i
4yll
yll4s
yl4sk
ym4d
ym3is
ym2s
ynd3u4
yngs4
yn4ism
yn3sló
yp3a
ypp5il
yr5en
yrf4l
yr2g
y4r1i
yr3ir3
yr5is5
yr2j3
yr2k
yrk3l
yrk3ve
yr2l
yrl4i
yrl5un
yr2m
yr4re
yrr5t
yr2s
yr1u
yr3ug
y2s
ysaf4
ys4ar
ysl4i
y3ste
y4sti
y4sty
4yt
yt1e
yt4isl
yt4ka
yt2r
ytri3
4yu
y1v4
y3þ
ý1a
ý1b
ý5e
ýf3il
ýfl4i
ýfn4
ý4gj
ý3gr
ý1h
ý3i
ý4il
ýj3að
ýjaf4
ýj5ars
ýj5á
ýl4f
ýl1i
ým1i
ým4k
ý4p
ýp2k
ýri1m
ýrip4
ýr1is
ýrk3a
ýrl2
ýrr4i
ý4si
ýs3in
ý4sj
ýs4l
ýs4ur
ý3u
ý5ú
ý1v
ý1y
z5b
z5er
z3í
zl5að
zóph3
þ4a2
5þak
þak5r
þar2
þarf5ar.
þaul5
þá4m
þer4
þé2
3þi
þin4g
þing3r
þis4
3þj
þjó4f
4þm
þo4
þor3f
þor5g
þor2s
þó2
þóf3ara
2þ3ól4
þór3i
3þ2r4
þra4
þrá5f
þris4
þrí3
þríf4
þrík4
þ4u2
þum3a4
þumal5
þumb3
þung5l
þur2
þur3í
þurr5e
5þú
þú4s
þ2v
þvag5r
þver5f4
þver5k
þver5l
þver5sn
3þy
þyr3i
þyrni3
þög3u
æ1b
æ5dr
æð2s
æfil4s
æg4ist
æg4isv
ægis4ve
ægraf4
æg4t
æ3h
æ1i
4æj3
æj4al
æjar5k
æj4as
æj4ur
2æk
æk3as
ækj3ar
ækj5ó
ækk3
æk3li
ækl3ó
ækt3
4æl
ælf4
æl1is
æl4isn
æls4i
4æm
æm5ari
æm3ast
æm2d
æm3ið
æm1is
æmis4lí
æm2s
æm5unu
4æn
æn4d
æn4ó
æn2s
æp3ast
2ær
ærak4
ær5and
ærif4
ær1is
ær5isk
ærl4
æ5ro
5æruver
æ4sa
æ4si
æs3in
æs4isa
æ4sn
æt5isk
æti4st
ætl1
ætti4
ætt3is5
æ5u
æv3ar
æv4ara
æ3vet
æv1in
æ3ví
æ3þ
öar4
2öð
öð2v
ö2f
ö3fa
öfra5m
öfr5u
öf1u
öf3ug
öf3ul
öf3un
ö2g
ög3e
ög1gi
ög1gj
ög1r
ög4ri
ög3s
ög4tr
ög3uð
ög3ull
ögu3s
ö4k
ökkj4
ökk4v
ökr4
ök3ræ
ök3s
ök2t
ök3ul
ök3unn
ök4uri
ökva3
ök3ví
ö4l
ölf4a
öl5lis
öl3ma
öl1mi
öls4k
öl2t
öl3und
ölu3t4
öl2v
öl5æ
ö4m2
öm3u
ön3da
önd4l
öng4lin
öng2v
öng4va
öngv3ar
önk3
ön3un
öp1u
öp3ul
ör1e
örg5á
ör5í
örkamb4
ör4lin
örm5un
ör3ó
ör4si
ört4v
öru3f
ör5ugg
öru3k
ör3ull
öru1m
ör1un
ör3und
ör4up
öru3s
ör2v
örv5að
ör4valla
örv3ars
ör3vit
5ör1y
ör3æ
ör4æð
ö4s
öskr3
ösk3unn
ösk4up
ös4l
ös5ó
ös4s
4öst
öst4i
ös3u
öt4sa
öt4si
öt4sæ
ött5ul
öt5ung
öt2v
ö5u
1öxi
5öxl
öx4n
